Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 1. Investment

§ 3641.
Common investment of individual trust funds.

In its discretion, an educational institution may associate together for common investment the funds of individual trusts or individual funds held by it whether created by order of court or otherwise, if the terms of the trust or gift do not require a separate investment.
For that purpose, an educational institution may create an investment account in which may be placed for investment the whole or any part of the funds of trusts or gifts permitted to be associated.
An individual trust or gift whose funds are thus associated shall at all times be the equitable owner of its pro rata share of the funds of such investment account and the net increase or decrease of its principal during the time its funds are a part of such account.